Connecticut, session 2026, SB00500.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 17a-215c of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July 1,
3 2026):
4 (d) The Commissioner of Social Services may seek approval of an
5 amendment to the Medicaid state plan or a waiver from federal law,
6 whichever is sufficient and most expeditious, to establish and
7 implement a Medicaid-financed home and community-based program
8 to provide community-based services and, if necessary, housing
9 assistance, to adults diagnosed with autism spectrum disorder but not
10 with intellectual disability. Within available appropriations, the
11 commissioner shall establish a caregiver respite program to assist
12 parents of persons enrolled in any Medicaid home and community-
13 based waiver program for adults diagnosed with autism spectrum
sSB500 / File No. 489 1

sSB500 File No. 489
14 disorder by providing state-financed care of such persons.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 17a-215c(d)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsection (d), "children" was changed to "persons" and "waiver
program" was changed to "waiver program for adults diagnosed with
autism spectrum disorder" for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB500 / File No. 489 2

sSB500 File No. 489
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost See Below See Below
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS)
associated with creating a state-funded respite program to support
caregivers of individuals with autism spectrum disorder who are
enrolled in the Medicaid Autism Spectrum Disorder (ASD) waiver
program. The cost will depend on funds appropriated to the program
and additional staff and resources needed to operate the program.
For reference, the most recent Autism Waiver Waitlist report (April
2025) reported that there were 2,249 individuals on the waitlist, 217
individuals actively receiving services, and 140 individuals assigned a
case manager and moving through the enrollment process.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
sSB500 / File No. 489 3

sSB500 File No. 489
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 500
AN ACT CONCERNING A STATE-FUNDED CAREGIVER PROGRAM
TO ASSIST PARENTS OF PERSONS WITH AUTISM SPECTRUM
DISORDER ENROLLED IN A MEDICAID WAIVER PROGRAM.